Washington statutes.
RCW 11.130.075

Guardian ad litem.

The court at any time may appoint a guardian ad litem for an individual if the court determines the individual's interest otherwise would not be adequately represented. If no conflict of interest exists, a guardian ad litem may be appointed to represent multiple individuals or interests. The guardian ad litem may not be the same individual as the attorney representing the respondent. The court shall state the duties of the guardian ad litem and the reasons for the appointment.

[ 2019 c 437 s 115.]